Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 5

Enforcement and Remedies

66-28-501. Noncompliance with rental agreement by landlord.

Except as provided in this chapter, the tenant may recover damages, obtain injunctive relief and recover reasonable attorney's fees for any noncompliance by the landlord with the rental agreement or any section of this chapter upon giving fourteen (14) days' written notice.

If the rental agreement is terminated for noncompliance after sufficient notice, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security deposits recoverable by the tenant under § 66-28-301.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.101; 1978, ch. 735, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-2841.

Cross-References. Forfeiture of rent by landlord for failure to comply with health department order, §68-111-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 16.

Law Reviews.

Self-Help: Extrajudicial Rights, Privileges and Remedies in Contemporary American Society, 37 Vand. L. Rev. 845 (1984).

66-28-502. Failure to supply essential services.

If the landlord deliberately or negligently fails to supply essential services, the tenant shall give written notice to the landlord specifying the breach and may do one (1) of the following:

Procure essential services during the period of the landlord's noncompliance and deduct their actual and reasonable costs from the rent;

Recover damages based upon the diminution in the fair rental value of the dwelling unit, provided tenant continues to occupy premises; or

Procure reasonable substitute housing during the period of the landlord's noncompliance, in which case the tenant is excused from paying rent for the period of the landlord's noncompliance.

In addition to the remedy provided in subdivision (a)(1)(C), the tenant may recover the actual and reasonable value of the substitute housing and in any case under this subsection (a), reasonable attorney's fees.

“Essential services” means utility services, including gas, heat, electricity, and any other obligations imposed upon the landlord which materially affect the health and safety of the tenant.

A tenant who proceeds under this section may not proceed under § 66-28-501 or § 66-28-503 as to that breach.

The rights under this section do not arise until the tenant has given written notice to the landlord and has shown that the condition was not caused by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of the tenant's family, or other person on the premises with the tenant's consent.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.102; 1978, ch. 735, § 2; T.C.A., § 64-2842.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-503. Fire or casualty damage.

If the dwelling unit or premises are damaged or destroyed by fire or casualty to an extent that the use of the dwelling unit is substantially impaired, the tenant:

May immediately vacate the premises; and

Shall notify the landlord in writing within fourteen (14) days thereafter of the tenant's intention to terminate the rental agreement, in which case the rental agreement terminates as of the date of vacating.

If the dwelling unit or premises are damaged or destroyed by fire or casualty to an extent that restoring the dwelling unit or premises to its undamaged condition requires the tenant to vacate the premises, the landlord is authorized to terminate the rental agreement within fourteen (14) days of providing written notice to the tenant.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security deposits recoverable under § 66-28-301. If the tenant vacates pursuant to this section, accounting for rent is to occur as of the date the tenant returns the keys to the landlord or has, in fact, vacated the dwelling unit or premises whichever date is earlier.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.103; T.C.A., § 64-2843; Acts 2013, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 107, § 3 provided that the act, which added present subsection (b) and redesignated former subsection (b) as present amended subsection (c), shall apply to rental agreements entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Tenant's remedy where leased building suffers casualty damage, §66-7-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 31.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-504. Unlawful ouster, exclusion, or diminution of service.

If the landlord unlawfully removes or excludes the tenant from the premises or willfully diminishes services to the tenant by interrupting essential services as provided in the rental agreement to the tenant, the tenant may recover possession or terminate the rental agreement and, in either case, recover actual damages sustained by the tenant, and punitive damages when appropriate, plus a reasonable attorney's fee. If the rental agreement is terminated under this section, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security deposits.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.104; T.C.A., § 64-2844.

Cross-References. Rented premises unfit for habitation, title 68, ch. 111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 16.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-505. Noncompliance by tenant — Failure to pay rent.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if there is a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or a noncompliance with § 66-28-401 materially affecting health and safety, the landlord may deliver a written notice to the tenant specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and that the rental agreement shall terminate as provided in subdivisions (a)(2) or (a)(3).

If the breach for which notice was given in subdivision (a)(1) is remediable by the payment of rent, the cost of repairs, damages, or any other amount due to the landlord pursuant to the rental agreement, the landlord may inform the tenant that if the breach is not remedied within fourteen (14) days after receipt of such notice, the rental agreement shall terminate, subject to the following:

All repairs to be made by the tenant to remedy the tenant's breach must be requested in writing by the tenant and authorized in writing by the landlord prior to such repairs being made; provided, however, that the notice sent pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) shall inform the tenant that prior written authorization must be given by the landlord to the tenant pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2)(A); and

If substantially the same act or omission which constituted a prior noncompliance of which notice was given recurs within six (6) months, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement upon at least seven (7) days' written notice specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement.

If the breach for which notice was given in subdivision (a)(1) is not remediable by the payment of rent, the cost of repairs, damages, or any other amount due to the landlord pursuant to the rental agreement, the landlord may inform the tenant that the rental agreement shall terminate upon a date not less than fourteen (14) days after receipt of the notice.

Nothing in subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) shall be construed as requiring a landlord to provide additional notice to the tenant other than the notice required by this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the tenant waives any notice required by this section, the landlord may proceed to file a detainer warrant immediately upon breach of the agreement for failure to pay rent without the landlord providing notice of such breach to the tenant; provided, however, that this subsection (b) shall not reduce the tenant's grace period as provided in § 66-28-201. The tenant's waiver pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be set out in twelve (12) point bold font or larger in the rental agreement.

Notwithstanding notice of a breach or the filing of a detainer warrant pursuant to this section, the rental agreement is enforceable by the landlord for the collection of rent for the remaining term of the rental agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the landlord may recover damages and obtain injunctive relief for any noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or § 66-28-401. The landlord may recover reasonable attorney's fees for breach of contract and nonpayment of rent as provided in the rental agreement.

The landlord may recover punitive damages from the tenant for willful destruction of property caused by the tenant or by any other person on the premises with the tenant's consent.

It is deemed to be material noncompliance and default by the tenant with the rental agreement, if the tenant:

Misrepresents that there is a disability or disability-related need for the use of a service animal or support animal; or

Provides documentation under § 66-28-406(c) that falsely states an animal is a service animal or support animal.

As used in this subsection (f), “service animal” and “support animal” have the same meanings as the terms are defined in § 66-28-406(a).

In the event of any violation under subdivision (f)(1), the landlord may terminate the tenancy and recover damages, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney's fees.

Only to the extent it conflicts with federal or state law, this subsection (f) does not apply to public housing units owned by a governmental entity.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.201; T.C.A., § 64-2845; Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 11; 2014, ch. 593, §§ 1-3; 2018, ch. 960, § 2; 2019, ch. 236, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 16 provided that the act, which rewrote this section, shall apply to rental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 2011.

Acts 2018, ch. 960, § 4 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to any rental agreement entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6 provided that the act shall apply to any rental agreement entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2019, and any request for an exception to a landlord's policy that prohibits or limits animals on the property made on or after July 1, 2019.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (f).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (f), which read: “(f) It is deemed to be material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement, if the tenant pretends to have a disability-related need for an assistance animal in order to obtain an exception to a provision in a rental agreement that prohibits pets or establishes limits on the types of pets that tenants may possess on residential rental property. As used in this subsection (f), ‘assistance animal’ means an animal that works, provides assistance, or performs tasks for the benefit of a person with a disability, or provides emotional support that alleviates one (1) or more identified symptoms or effects of a person's disability.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 960, § 4. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Assignment of interest in lease or rent, §66-26-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, §§ 12, 28, 32.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

Collateral References.

Constructive eviction by another tenant's conduct. 1 A.L.R.4th 849.

Modern status of rule as to tenant's rent liability after injury to or destruction of demised premises. 99 A.L.R.3d 738.

66-28-506. Failure of tenant to maintain dwelling.

If there is noncompliance by the tenant with §66-28-401 materially affecting health and safety that can be remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item or cleaning, and the tenant fails to comply as promptly as conditions require in case of emergency or within fourteen (14) days after written notice by the landlord specifying the breach and requesting that the tenant remedy it within that period of time, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit and cause the work to be done in a workmanlike manner and submit an itemized bill for the actual and reasonable cost or the fair and reasonable value thereof as rent on the next date when periodic rent is due, or if the rental agreement has terminated, for immediate payment.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.202; T.C.A., § 64-2846.

Cross-References. Covenant to leave in good repair, §66-7-102.

Law Reviews.

Avoiding Lease-Drafting Pitfalls (C. Dewees Berry IV), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1983).

Collateral References.

Measure and elements of damages for lessee's breach of covenant as to repairs. 45 A.L.R.5th 251.

66-28-507. Absence, nonuse or abandonment by tenant.

If the rental agreement requires the tenant to give notice to the landlord of an anticipated extended absence in excess of seven (7) days as required in § 66-28-404 and the tenant willfully fails to do so, the landlord may recover actual damages from the tenant.

During any absence of the tenant in excess of seven (7) days, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit at times reasonably necessary.

If the tenant abandons the dwelling unit, the landlord shall use reasonable efforts to rerent the dwelling unit at a fair rental. If the landlord rents the dwelling unit for a term beginning prior to the expiration of the rental agreement, the rental agreement is terminated as of the date of the new tenancy. If the tenancy is from month-to-month, or week-to-week, the term of the rental agreement for this purpose shall be deemed to be a month or a week, as the case may be.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.203; T.C.A., § 64-2847.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

Collateral References.

Landlord's remedy by way of distress or lien on defaulting tenant's property on leased premises as including right to collect for all unpaid utility expenses. 99 A.L.R.3d 1100.

66-28-508. Waiver of landlord's right to terminate.

If the landlord accepts rent without reservation and with knowledge of a tenant default, the landlord by such acceptance condones the default and thereby waives such landlord's right and is estopped from terminating the rental agreement as to that breach.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.204; T.C.A., § 64-2848.

Law Reviews.

Avoiding Lease-Drafting Pitfalls (C. Dewees Berry IV), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1983).

66-28-509. Landlord liens.

A contracted lien or security interest on behalf of the landlord in the tenant's household goods shall not be enforceable unless perfected by a Uniform Commercial Code filing with the secretary of state. All other liens are hereby expressly prohibited under this chapter. The landlord shall be responsible for releasing the lien at expiration or termination of the lease.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.205; T.C.A., § 64-2849.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 138; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 13.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-510. Landlord's remedy after termination.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord may have a claim for possession and for rent and a separate claim for actual damages for breach of the rental agreement and reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.206; T.C.A., § 64-2850.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 12.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

Collateral References.

Measure and elements of damages for lessee's breach of covenant as to repairs. 45 A.L.R.5th 251.

66-28-511. Recovery of possession by landlord limited.

A landlord may not recover or take possession of the dwelling unit by action or otherwise, including willful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of electric, gas, water or other essential service to the tenant, except in case of abandonment, surrender, or as permitted in this chapter.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.207; T.C.A., § 64-2851.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-28-512. Termination of periodic tenancy — Holdover remedies.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a week-to-week tenancy by a written notice given to the other at least ten (10) days prior to the termination date specified in the notice.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a month-to-month tenancy by a written notice given to the other at least thirty (30) days prior to the periodic rental date specified in the notice.

If a tenant remains in possession without the landlord's consent after expiration of the term of the rental agreement or its termination, the landlord may bring an action for possession, back rent and reasonable attorney's fees as well as any other damages provided for in the lease. If the tenant's holdover is willful and not in good faith, the landlord, in addition, may also recover actual damages sustained by the landlord, plus reasonable attorney's fees. If the landlord consents to the tenant's continued occupancy, § 66-28-201(c) shall apply.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.301; T.C.A., § 64-2852; Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 16 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall apply to rental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 2011.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 33.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in Land (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 53, 55 (1980).

66-28-513. Remedies for abuse of access.

If the tenant refuses to allow lawful access, the landlord may obtain injunctive relief to compel access, or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the landlord may recover actual damages and reasonable attorney's fees.

If the landlord makes an unlawful entry or a lawful entry in an unreasonable manner or makes repeated demands for entry otherwise lawful but which have the effect of unreasonably harassing the tenant, the tenant may obtain injunctive relief to prevent the recurrence of the conduct, or terminate the rental agreement. In either case, the tenant may recover actual damages and reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 4.302; T.C.A., § 64-2853.

66-28-514. Retaliatory conduct prohibited.

Except as provided in this section, a landlord may not retaliate by increasing rent or decreasing services or by bringing or threatening to bring an action for possession because the tenant:

Has complained to the landlord of a violation under § 66-28-301; or

Has made use of remedies provided under this chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a landlord may bring an action for possession if:

The violation of the applicable building or housing code was caused primarily by lack of reasonable care by the tenant or other person in the tenant's household or upon the premises with the tenant's consent;

The tenant is in default in rent; or

Compliance with the applicable building or housing code requires alteration, remodeling, or demolition which would effectively deprive the tenant of use of the dwelling unit.

The maintenance of the action does not release the landlord from liability under § 66-28-501(b).

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 5.101; T.C.A., § 64-2854.

Cross-References. Landlord may not penalize tenant for filing a complaint with the building inspector, §68-111-105.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-515. Administration of remedies — Enforcement.

The remedies provided by this chapter shall be so administered that the aggrieved party may recover lawful damages. The aggrieved party has an obligation and duty to mitigate damages.

Any right or obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by legal action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and limited effect.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 1.105; T.C.A., § 64-2855.

Collateral References.

Landlord's duty, on tenant's failure to occupy, or abandonment of, premises, to mitigate damages by accepting or procuring another tenant. 75 A.L.R.5th 1.

66-28-516. Obligation of good faith.

Every duty under this chapter and every act which must be performed as a condition precedent to the exercise of a right or remedy under this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 1.302; T.C.A., § 64-2856.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-517. Termination by landlord for violence or threats to health, safety, or welfare of persons or property.

A landlord may terminate a rental agreement within three (3) days from the date written notice is received by the tenant if the tenant or any other person on the premises with the tenant's consent:

Willfully or intentionally commits a violent act;

Behaves in a manner which constitutes or threatens to be a real and present danger to the health, safety or welfare of the life or property of other tenants or persons on the premises;

Creates a hazardous or unsanitary condition on the property that affects the health, safety or welfare or the life or property of other tenants or persons on the premises; or

Refuses to vacate the premises after entering the premises as an unauthorized subtenant or other unauthorized occupant.

The notice required by this section shall specifically detail the violation which has been committed and shall be effective only from the date of receipt of the notice by the tenant.

Upon receipt of such written notice, the tenant shall be entitled to immediate access to any court of competent jurisdiction for the purpose of obtaining a temporary or permanent injunction against such termination by the landlord.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a landlord to recover or take possession of the dwelling unit by action or otherwise including willful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing interruption of electric, gas or other essential service to the tenant except in the case of abandonment or surrender.

If the landlord's action in terminating the lease under this provision is willful and not in good faith, the tenant may in addition recover actual damages sustained by the tenant plus reasonable attorney's fees.

The failure to bring an action for or to obtain an injunction may not be used as evidence in any action to recover possession of the dwelling unit.

If domestic abuse, as defined in § 36-3-601, is the underlying offense for which a tenancy is terminated, only the perpetrator may be evicted. The landlord shall not evict the victims, minor children under eighteen (18) years of age, or innocent occupants, any of whom occupy the subject premises under a lease agreement, based solely on the domestic abuse. Even if evicted or removed from the lease, the perpetrator shall remain financially liable for all amounts due under all terms and conditions of the present lease agreement.

If a lease agreement is in effect at the time that the domestic abuse is committed, the landlord may remove the perpetrator from the lease agreement and require the remaining adult tenants to qualify for and enter into a new agreement for the remainder of the present lease term. The landlord shall not be responsible for any and all damages suffered by the perpetrator due to the bifurcation and termination of the lease agreement in accordance with this section.

If domestic abuse, as defined in § 36-3-601, is the underlying offense for which tenancy could be terminated, the victim and all adult tenants shall agree, in writing, not to allow the perpetrator to return to the subject premises or any part of the community property, and to immediately report the perpetrator's return to the proper authority, for the remainder of the tenancy. A violation of such agreement shall be cause to terminate tenancy as to any victim and all other tenants.

The rights under this section shall not apply until the victim has been judicially granted an order of protection against the perpetrator for the specific incident for which tenancy is being terminated, a copy of such order has been provided to the landlord, and the order:

Provides for the perpetrator to move out or vacate immediately;

Prohibits the perpetrator from coming by or to a shared residence;

Requires that the perpetrator stay away from the victim's residence; or

Finds that the perpetrator's continuing to reside in the rented or leased premises may jeopardize the life, health, and safety of the victim or the victim's minor children.

Failure to comply with this section, or dismissal of an order of protection that allows application of this section, abrogates the rights provided to the victim, minor children, and innocent occupants under this section.

The rights granted in this section shall not apply in any situation where the perpetrator is a child or dependent of any tenant.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the eviction of a victim of domestic abuse for non-payment of rent, a lease violation, or any violation of this chapter.

Acts 1983, ch. 271, § 1; 2011, ch. 272, § 13; 2012, ch. 887, § 2; 2016, ch. 895, § 1; 2020, ch. 528, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 16 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a), shall apply to rental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 2011.

Acts 2012, ch. 887, § 3, provided that the act, which amended subdivision (a)(3), shall apply to rental agreements entered into or renewed on or after May 9, 2012.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (g).

The 2020 amendment added (a)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 895, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2020, ch. 528, § 3. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-28-518. Towing of unauthorized vehicles.

A landlord may have an unauthorized vehicle towed or otherwise removed from real property leased or rented by such landlord for residential purposes, upon giving ten (10) days written notice by posting the same upon the subject vehicle.

A landlord may have a tenant's, occupant's, tenant's guest's, or trespasser's vehicle immediately towed or otherwise removed from such real property, without notice, if and when such person fails to comply with the landlord's permit parking policy as defined in the landlord's posted signage.

A landlord may have a tenant's, occupant's, tenant's guest's, or trespasser's vehicle immediately towed or otherwise removed from such real property, without notice, for such person's failure to comply with the landlord's posted signage relative to traffic and parking restrictions, including, but not limited to, traffic lanes, fire lanes, fire hydrants, accessible parking areas for persons with disabilities, and/or the blocking of trash receptacles.

The owner or lessee of a vehicle that has been removed pursuant to this section may make application to take possession of such vehicle and remove such vehicle from the place to which it has been removed or stored by paying the costs of removing such vehicle, plus the accrued towing and storage charges.

Acts 1999, ch. 284, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

66-28-519. Towing of vehicles.

A landlord may have the following vehicles towed or otherwise removed from real property leased or rented by such landlord for residential purposes, upon giving a ten-day written notice by posting the same upon the subject vehicle:

A vehicle with one (1) or more flat or missing tires;

A vehicle unable to operate under its own power;

A vehicle with a missing or broken windshield or more than one (1) broken or missing window;

A vehicle with one (1) or more missing fenders or bumpers; or

A motor vehicle that has not been in compliance with all applicable local or state laws relative to titling, licensing, operation, and registration for more than thirty (30) days.

If the owner of the vehicle is not present, then prior to removing the vehicle pursuant to this section, the person, firm or entity that actually tows the vehicle shall notify local law enforcement of the vehicle identification number (VIN), registration information, license plate number and description of the vehicle. Local law enforcement shall keep a record of all such information which shall be available for public inspection.

Acts 1999, ch. 284, § 1; 2011, ch. 244, § 3; 2012, ch. 834, § 1.

66-28-520. Towing of nuisance vehicles.

Any nuisance vehicle located on or about the premises of real property that has been leased or rented for residential purposes may be towed or otherwise removed from such premises by the landlord upon giving twenty-four (24) hours written notice by posting the same upon the subject vehicle.

Acts 1999, ch. 284, § 1.

66-28-521. Termination of utility services.

If a written rental agreement requires the tenant to have utility services placed in the tenant's name and the tenant fails to do so within three (3) days of occupancy of the rented premises, the landlord may have such utility services terminated if the existing utility service is in the name of the landlord.

Acts 2003, ch. 318, § 1; 2011, ch. 272, §§ 14, 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 16 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to rental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 2011.